Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.140

Certified copy of record of brand—Fee.

The owner of a brand of record may obtain from the director a certified copy of the record of the owner's brand upon payment of a fee of fifteen dollars.

[ 2003 c 326 s 15; 1994 c 46 s 18; 1993 c 354 s 7; 1974 ex.s. c 64 s 4; 1959 c 54 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 46: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Prior legislative approval—1994 c 46: See note following RCW 16.65.030.